Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2486
Manner of presentation of claims.

Claims against a decedent's estate may be presented as follows:

(1) The claimant may file a written statement of the claim, in the form prescribed by rule, with the clerk of the court. The claim is deemed presented on the filing of the claim with the court. If a claim is not yet due, the date when it will become due shall be stated. If the claim is contingent or unliquidated, the nature of the uncertainty shall be stated. If the claim is secured, the security shall be described. Failure to describe correctly the security, the nature of any uncertainty, and the due date of a claim not yet due does not invalidate the presentation made.

(2) The claimant may commence a proceeding against the personal representative in any court which has subject matter jurisdiction and the personal representative may be subjected to jurisdiction, to obtain payment of his or her claim against the estate, but the commencement of the proceeding must occur within the time limited for presenting the claim. No presentation of claim is required in regard to matters claimed in proceedings against the decedent which were pending at the time of his or her death.

(3) If a claim is presented under subsection (1), no proceeding thereon may be commenced more than sixty days after the personal representative has mailed a notice of disallowance; but, in the case of a claim which is not presently due or which is contingent or unliquidated, the personal representative may consent to an extension of the sixty-day period, or to avoid injustice the court, on petition, may order an extension of the sixty-day period, but in no event shall the extension run beyond the applicable statute of limitations.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 164, UPC § 3-804;

Laws 1981, LB 42, § 20.

1. Presenting or filing claim

2. Miscellaneous

1. Presenting or filing claim

An otherwise valid amended complaint, filed after a complaint filed prematurely under section 30-2404 but after the appointment or reappointment of a personal representative, is sufficient to commence a proceeding within the meaning of subsection (2) of this section. Sparks v. Mach, 314 Neb. 724, 993 N.W.2d 119 (2023).

Under subsection (2) of this section, an action against a decedent's estate is not commenced unless a claimant files a lawsuit against the personal representative of the estate. Sparks v. Mach, 314 Neb. 724, 993 N.W.2d 119 (2023).

The claimant failed to properly file or present a claim against the decedent's estate when he discussed a promissory note with the copersonal representative and the attorney for the personal representatives approximately 29 days after the decedent's death and mailed a copy of the note, a letter, and his calculation of interest to them the next day. In re Estate of Lakin, 310 Neb. 271, 965 N.W.2d 365 (2021).

For purposes of this section, a demand against the trust assets is not a claim against the decedent's estate. In re Estate of Giventer, 310 Neb. 39, 964 N.W.2d 234 (2021).

Mere notice to a representative of an estate regarding a possible demand or claim against the estate does not constitute presenting or filing a claim under this section. J.R. Simplot Co. v. Jelinek, 275 Neb. 548, 748 N.W.2d 17 (2008); In re Estate of Feuerhelm, 215 Neb. 872, 341 N.W.2d 342 (1983).

Giving the language in this section a consistent, harmonious, and sensible construction, it is apparent that the filing of a claim is a separate and distinct act from the initiation of a legal proceeding to pursue payment of the claim. Therefore, the filing of a claim does not commence an action and does not in and of itself require the services of an attorney. In re Estate of Cooper, 275 Neb. 297, 746 N.W.2d 653 (2008).

The filing of a statement of claim is an administrative step by which the personal representative is advised, in accordance with the probate statutes, of the identities of the creditors and the amounts of their claims. In re Estate of Cooper, 275 Neb. 297, 746 N.W.2d 653 (2008).

When a claim presented in the manner described in this section and within the time limit described in section 30-2485 is disallowed by the personal representative, the dissatisfied claimant may, within 60 days of the mailing of notice of the disallowance, commence a proceeding against the personal representative in the district court insofar as the claim relates to matters within the district court's chancery or common-law jurisdiction. Holdrege Co-op Assn. v. Wilson, 236 Neb. 541, 463 N.W.2d 312 (1990).

Implicit in the language "the claimant may file a written statement of the claim . . . ." is the requirement that the creditor to whom the decedent is obligated is the claimant who can present a demand against the estate. J.J. Schaefer Livestock Hauling v. Gretna St. Bank, 229 Neb. 580, 428 N.W.2d 185 (1988); In re Estate of Feuerhelm, 215 Neb. 872, 341 N.W.2d 342 (1983).

The Nebraska Probate Code provides two methods of presenting a claim against a decedent's estate: A claim can be presented by filing a written statement thereof with the clerk of the probate court or by commencing a proceeding against the personal representative in any court which has jurisdiction. Estate of Hansen v. Bergmeier, 20 Neb. App. 458, 825 N.W.2d 224 (2013).

For purposes of any statute of limitations, the proper presentation of a claim is equivalent to commencement of a proceeding on the claim. Lenners v. St. Paul Fire & Marine Ins. Co., 18 Neb. App. 772, 793 N.W.2d 357 (2010).

2. Miscellaneous

Under the Nebraska Probate Code, the first statute of limitations to apply will accomplish a bar. Sparks v. Mach, 314 Neb. 724, 993 N.W.2d 119 (2023).

Although identifying the amount of a claim is not statutorily required, doing so advances the purpose of section 30-2485. In re Estate of Karmazin, 299 Neb. 315, 908 N.W.2d 381 (2018).

If a claim is brought pursuant to the probate claims procedure, the burden is on the claimant seeking compensation to prove that he or she rendered services and the reasonable value thereof. In re Estate of Wagner, 253 Neb. 498, 571 N.W.2d 76 (1997).

While the plaintiffs did voluntarily dismiss a county court action after the nonclaim statute had run and were thus barred from pursuing a claim against the estate, they remained free to proceed against the decedent's insurer to the extent of insurance coverage available. Tank v. Peterson, 214 Neb. 34, 332 N.W.2d 669 (1983).

Section 24-517(1) confers upon the county court exclusive original
jurisdiction of all matters relating to the decedents' estates, including
the probate of wills and the construction thereof, except as provided in
section 30-2464(c) and this section. Lenners v. St. Paul Fire & Marine
Ins. Co., 18 Neb. App. 772, 793 N.W.2d 357 (2010).

Although this section provides authority for a claimant to present a claim against the estate by commencing an action against the personal representative, this section does not provide authority for a claimant to commence an action against a former personal representative who has already been discharged and whose appointment has already been terminated. Mach v. Schmer, 4 Neb. App. 819, 550 N.W.2d 385 (1996).